District of Columbia statutes.
25-302

Special qualifications for wholesaler’s or retailer’s licenses.

In the case of an application for a wholesaler’s license or for a retailer’s license of any class, except a temporary license, before issuing, transferring to a new owner, or renewing a license, the Board shall further determine that:

(1)

No manufacturer, wholesaler, or shareholder holding 25% or more of the common stock of, or equity interest in, a manufacturer or wholesaler, or officer of a manufacturer or wholesaler corporation, or partner or member of a partnership or limited liability company owning 25% or more of its equity interest, has such a substantial interest, direct or indirect, in the applicant’s business or establishment that the applicant would be influenced to purchase alcoholic beverages from the manufacturer or wholesaler; and

(2)

The business for which the license is sought has not been, and will not be, conducted with money, equipment, furniture, fixtures, or property (A) rented from, (B) loaned from, (C) given by, or (D) sold for less than fair market value, upon a conditional sale agreement, or a chattel trust from, a manufacturer, wholesaler, shareholder holding 25% or more of the common stock of, or equity interest in, a manufacturer or wholesaler, or officer of a manufacturer or wholesaler corporation, or partner or member of a partnership or limited liability company owning 25% or more of its equity interest.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1973 Ed., § 25-115.
1981 Ed., § 25-302.